Utah statutes.
73-12-4.   Purposes for which land is to be used.

Said lands to be used by the United States of America as aforesaid in connection with the development and use of water for irrigation and other purposes in this state under the provisions of the Act of Congress known as the Reclamation Act, approved June 17, 1902 (32 Stat. 388) and/or of the Act of Congress known as the National Industrial Recovery Act, approved June 16, 1933 (48 Stat. 195), and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto.

